Connecticut, session 2026, SB00382.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Food distribution organization" means a nonprofit organization
that collects and distributes food to individuals for human
consumption;
(2) "Food recovery service" means an entity that collects and
transports food from a supermarket to a food distribution organization;
(3) "Supermarket" means a retail food store in the state that occupies
a total retail sales area of at least fifteen thousand square feet; and
(4) "Surplus edible food" means food intended for human
consumption that (A) is unsold due to surplus, cosmetic appearance,
nearing its expiration date or packaging damage that does not
compromise food safety, and (B) complies with all applicable food
safety standards.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection, in consultation with the Commissioner of Public Health,
shall develop and implement guidelines for supermarkets to donate
surplus edible food to food distribution organizations throughout the
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 382
state using a food recovery service and post such guidelines on the
Department of Consumer Protection's Internet web site.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, each
supermarket shall report to the Commissioner of Consumer Protection,
in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, regarding its
donation of surplus edible food in accordance with the guidelines
developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Not later than February 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, regarding the
donation of surplus edible food as reported by each supermarket
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to consumer protection and public health.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2